src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON 2NJUNE_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_NJUNE_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Nom:^SV^EA^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff12nom ; ! njunnáám 
+N+Sg+Gen:^SV^EA^WG^RLEN^SLEN VPXsuff12 ; ! njuunáád 
+N+Sg+Acc:^SV^EA^WG^RLEN^SLEN VPXsuff12 ; ! njuunáád 
+N+Sg+Nom:^SV^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff3 ;  ! njunnees 
+N+Sg+Gen:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN VPXsuff3 ; ! njuunees 
+N+Sg+Acc:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN VPXsuff3 ;  ! njuunees 
+N+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st CPXsuff ;  ! njunestis 
+N+Sg+Ill:^EA^CSH%>s CPXsuff ;  !  njunásis 
+N+Sg+Com:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;  ! njunijnis 
+N+Ess:%>n CPXsuff ;                        ! njunenis 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2CAANA_SG_DIM ; 
+N+Der1+Der/lasj:^EA^WG%>l ANOLASJ ; 
+N+Der1+Der2+Der/Car:^WG%>tt MUSTOTTEM ; 
 
 
LEXICON 2NJUNE_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_NJUNE_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^WG^RLEN%>i Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG%>ijd CPXsuff ;  !njunijdis 
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG%>ijn CPXsuff ;  !njunijnis 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG%>ijd CPXsuffCOM ;  !njunijdiskuin 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2ALGE_PL_DIM ; 
 
LEXICON X_NJUNE_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom: K ;          ! njuṇe 
+Sg+Gen:^WG K ;  ! njune 
+Sg+Acc:^WG K ;  ! njune 
+Sg+Ill:^EA^CSH%>n K ;                 ! njuṇán # stem e>á 
+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN%>st K ;       ! njuuneest # earlier also^RVL 
!+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN%>in K ;              ! njunnijn # MM + MLO hardcording 
+Sg+Com:^WG^RLEN%>in K ;               ! njuunijn # KORP, MLO+MM 
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá K ;                  ! njunettáá 
+Ess:^SV^CLEN^SLEN%>n K ;              ! njunneen 
+Par:^SV^CLEN^SLEN%>d K ;              ! njunneed 

LEXICON X_NJUNE_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Nom:^WG%>h K ; 
+Pl+Ill:^WG^RLEN%>id K ;                ! njuunijd  # stem e > i in > jn 
 X_WG_RLEN_PL_Loc ; 
 
!! ### 2ALME - 2ALGE - 2NIJBE lexicon family 
 
!LEXICON 2ALME !!≈ * ''@CODE@'' 
!+N+Pl+Ill:^WG^RLEN%>id K ;                 ! oolmijd 
!2ALGE ; 
! 
LEXICON 2ALGE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
2ALGE_SG ; 
2ALGE_PL ; 

LEXICON 2NIJTTO !!≈ * **@CODE@** as alge, but with special dim
2NIJTTO_SG ;
2NIJTTO_PL ;

LEXICON 2NIJTTO_SG
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2NIJTTO_SG_DIM ; ! special dim for -o only
+N: X_ALGE_SG ; 
   2ALGE_SG_PX ;

LEXICON 2NIJTTO_PL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2ALGE_PL_DIM ; ! .. as for sg
+N: X_ALGE_PL ; 
2ALGE_PL_PX ;

LEXICON X_ALGE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
X_ALGE_SG ; 
X_ALGE_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2ALGE_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2ALGE_SG_DIM ; !a^RVlge alga (e:a) S_ALGAAS algaaš ko^RVlle  S_CISSAAS kollááš 
+N: X_ALGE_SG ; 
   2ALGE_SG_PX ;

LEXICON 2ALGE_SG_PX
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Nom:^EA VPXsuff12nom ;  !         algaam tikkám 
+N+Sg+Gen:^SV^EA^SLEN VPXsuff12 ;  !         algaan        tikkán 
+N+Sg+Acc:^SV^EA^SLEN VPXsuff12 ;  !algaan tikkád 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff3 ;  ! alges        tikkes 
+N+Sg+Gen:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff3 ;  ! algees        tihhees 
+N+Sg+Acc:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff3 ;  ! algees koddees tihhees 
+N+Sg+Ill:^EA%>s CPXsuff ;   !  algasân tikkásân 
+N+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st CPXsuff ;  ! tihestân algestân 
+N+Sg+Com:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;  ! tihijnis olgijnân 
!+N+Sg+Com:^WG VPXsuff12 ;  !kudijnân 
!+N+Sg+Com:^WG VPXsuff3 ;  ! kudijnis 
+N+Ess:%>n CPXsuff ;                         ! tikkenân alganân 
+N+Der1+Der/lasj:^EA^WG%>l ANOLASJ ; 
+N+Der1+Der2+Der/Car:^WG%>tt MUSTOTTEM ; 
 
LEXICON 2ALGE_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2NIJTTO_PL_DIM ; !a^RVlge alga (e:a) S_ALGAAS algaaš ko^RVlle  S_CISSAAS kollááš 
+N: X_ALGE_PL ; 
2ALGE_PL_PX ;

LEXICON 2ALGE_PL_PX
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^WG^RLEN%>i Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  !párnáidis čolmijdis tihijdis 
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  !párnáidis tihijdis 
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  !párnáidis tihijdis 
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;  !párnáidis tihijnân 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  !párnáidiskuin tihijdânguin 
 
LEXICON X_ALGE_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom: K ;          ! alge 
+Sg+Gen:^WG K ;   ! alge 
+Sg+Acc:^WG K ;   ! alge 
+Sg+Ill:^EA^CSH^RLEN%>n K ;         ! aalgan 
+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN%>st K ;    ! algeest 
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN%>in K ;            ! olgijn 
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá K ;               ! algettáá 
+Ess:%>n K ;                        ! algen 
+Par:%>d K ;                        ! alged 
 
LEXICON X_ALGE_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Nom:^WG%>h K ;                  ! algeh 
+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:^WG%>i K ;           ! olgij 
X_ALGE_NIIBE_PL ; 
 
LEXICON X_ALGE_NIIBE_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Gen:^WG^RLEN%>i K ;                ! oolgij 
+Pl+Acc:^WG^RLEN%>id K ;               ! oolgijd 
+Pl+Ill:^WG^CLEN%>id K ;               ! olgijd a^RVlme ni^RVjbe 
+Pl+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>in K ;               ! oolgijn 
+Pl+Com:^WG%>i GUIN ;                  ! olgijguin 
+Pl+Abe:^WG%>ittáá K ;                 ! olgijttáá 
 
LEXICON 2NIJBE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
2NIJBE_SG ; 
2NIJBE_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2NIJBE_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_NIJBE_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^WG^RLEN%>i Rhash ; 
+N+Ess:%>n CPXsuff ;               ! nijben 
+N+Sg+Nom:^EA VPXsuff12nom ;       ! nijbám 
+N+Sg+Gen:^EA^RLEN VPXsuff12 ;     ! nijbán 
+N+Sg+Acc:^EA^RLEN VPXsuff12 ;     ! nijbán 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff3 ;              ! nijbes 
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff3 ;      ! niijbes 
+N+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff3 ;      ! niijbes 
+N+Sg+Ill:^EA%>s CPXsuff ;         ! nijbásân 
+N+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st CPXsuff ;        ! nijbásis 
+N+Sg+Com:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;        ! nijbijnis 
+N+Ess:%>n CPXsuff ;               ! nijbenân 
+N+Der1+Der/lasj:^EA^WG%>l ANOLASJ ; 
+N+Der1+Der2+Der/Car:^WG%>tt MUSTOTTEM ; 
 
LEXICON 2NIJBE_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_NIJBE_PL ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
 
LEXICON X_NIJBE_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom: K ;                         ! nijbe 
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN K ;                 ! niijbe 
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN K ;                 ! niijbe 
+Sg+Ill:^EA^CSH^RLEN%>n K ;          ! niijbán 
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st K ;             ! niijbest 
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN%>in K ;             ! nijbijn 
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá K ;                ! nijbettáá 
+Ess:%>n K ;                         ! nijben 
+Par:%>d K ;                         ! nijbed 
 
LEXICON X_NIJBE_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>h K ;              ! niijbeh 
X_ALGE_NIIBE_PL ; 
!2ALGE_DIM ; 
 
 
 
 
!! ### 2VAHE lexicon family 
 
LEXICON 2VAHE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
2VAHE_SG ; 
2VAHE_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2VAHE_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_VAHE_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^WG^RLEN%>i Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Nom:^SV^EA^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff12nom ; ! vahhaam 
+N+Sg+Gen:^SV^EA^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff12 ;    ! vahhaan 
+N+Sg+Acc:^SV^EA^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff12 ;    ! vahhaan 
+N+Sg+Nom:^SV^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff3 ;        ! vahhees 
+N+Sg+Gen:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff3 ;     ! vavvees 
+N+Sg+Acc:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff3 ;     ! vavvees 
+N+Sg+Ill:^EA%>s CPXsuff ;                ! vahasân 
+N+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st CPXsuff ;               ! vavestân 
+N+Sg+Com:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;               ! vovijnân 
+N+Ess:%>n CPXsuff ;                      ! vahenân 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2ALGE_SG_DIM ; 
+N+Der1+Der/lasj:^EA^WG%>l ANOLASJ ; 
+N+Der1+Der2+Der/Car:^WG%>tt MUSTOTTEM ; 
 
LEXICON 2VAHE_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_ALGE_PL ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2ALGE_PL_DIM ; 
 
LEXICON X_VAHE_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom: K ;           ! vahe 
+Sg+Gen:^WG K ;  ! vave 
+Sg+Acc:^WG K ;  ! vave 
+Sg+Ill:^EA^CSH%>n K ;           ! vahan 
+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN%>st K ; ! vavveest 
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN%>in K ;         ! vovvijn 
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá K ;            ! vavettáá 
+Ess:^SV^CLEN^SLEN%>n K ;        ! vahheen 
+Par:^SV^CLEN^SLEN%>d K ;        ! vahheed 
 
 
 
