src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx !!≈ * **@CODE@** here we put all normal nouns, as before
julgâsijđo+v1+Sem/Dummytag:julgâ#si^RVjđo 2NIJBE "" ;
vijlo+v2+Sem/Dummytag:vi^RVjlo 2NIJTTO "" ;
suávlisijvo+v2+Sem/Dummytag:suávli#si^RVjvo 2NIJTTO "" ;
šuávlisijvo+v2+Sem/Dummytag:šuávli#si^RVjvo 2NIJTTO "" ;
julgâsijđo+v2+Sem/Dummytag:julgâ#si^RVjđo 2NIJTTO "" ;
kirdemlopekirje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Dummytag:kirdem#lope#ki^RVrje 2ALGE "lentolupakirja" ;
šahe+Sem/Dummytag:ša^RVh^RCe 2VAHE "sika" ;
rávásmâmahe+Sem/Dummytag:rávásmâm#a^RVh^RCe 2VAHE "murrosikä" ;
šolde+Sem/Dummytag:šo^RVlde 2ALGE "hela" ;
sáhávijlo+v2+Sem/Dummytag:sáhá#vi^RVjlo 2NIJTTO "sahanteräviila" ;
lijme+v1+Sem/Dummytag:li^RVjme 2NIJBE "liima" ;
taldriklijne+v1+Sem/Dummytag:taldrik#li^RVjne 2NIJBE "lautasliina" ;
muorâlanne+Sem/Build:muorâ#la^RVnne 2ALGE "puulinna" ;
ahelase+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Dummytag:ahe#la^RVs^RCe 2VAHE "ikälisä" ;
pargorijdo+v2+Sem/Dummytag:pargo#ri^RVjdo 2NIJTTO "työriita" ;
kihlekodde+Sem/Dummytag:kihle#ko^RVdde 2ALGE "kihlakunta" ;
viermivirde+Sem/Dummytag:viermi#vi^RVrde 2ALGE "verkkovirta" ;
staavvâlvijve+v1+Sem/Dummytag:staavvâl#vi^RVjve 2NIJBE "tavuviiva" ;
oljočievrâase+Sem/Dummytag:oljo#čievrâ#a^RVs^RCe 2VAHE "kestopäällyste" ;
snuibe+Sem/Dummytag:snu^RVi4be 2ALGE "lippalakki" ;
čuoigâmsijvo+v2+Sem/Dummytag:čuoigâm#si^RVjvo 2NIJTTO "hiihtokeli" ;
čuovâihe+Sem/Dummytag:čuovâ#i^RVh^RCe 2VAHE "valovuosi" ;
lokkesijđo+v1+Sem/Dummytag:lokke#si^RVjđo 2NIJBE "kansilehti" ;
meccipivdo+v2+Sem/Dummytag:mecci#pi^RVvdo 2NIJTTO "eränkäynti" ;
čuvđe+Sem/Dummytag:ču^RVvđe 2ALGE "hyppynen" ;
kubbeelase+Sem/Dummytag:kubbeel#a^RVs^RCe 2VAHE "lieriö" ;
cuvnâmtijme+v1+Sem/Dummytag:cuvnâm#ti^RVjme 2NIJBE "herätyskello" ;
njihe+Sem/Dummytag:nji^RVh^RCe 2VAHE "etukeno" ;
likkâmčalmeh+Sem/Dummytag:likkâm#ča^RVlme 2ALGE_PL "karsastus" ;
rapupivdo+v1+Sem/Dummytag:rapu#pi^RVvdo 2NIJBE "ravustus" ;
rapupivdo+v2+Sem/Dummytag:rapu#pi^RVvdo 2NIJTTO "ravustus" ;
peljipiltoh+Sem/Dummytag:pelji#pi^RVltto 2ALGE_PL "kuulokkeet" ;
poneh+Sem/Dummytag:po^RVnne 2ALGE_PL "porot" ;
nurde+Sem/Dummytag:nu^RVrde 2ALGE "kasvot" ;
riehti-iše+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Dummytag:riehti-#i^RVš^RCe 2VAHE "oikeusapu" ;
ovedemiše+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Dummytag:ovedem#i^RVš^RCe 2VAHE "kehitysapu" ;
päikkisijđo+v2+Sem/Dummytag:päikki#si^RVjđo 2NIJTTO "kotisivu" ;
luistelâmtijme+v1+Sem/Dummytag:luistelâm#ti^RVjme 2NIJBE ;
virgekodde+Sem/Dummytag:virge#ko^RVdde 2ALGE ;
noppe+Sem/Dummytag:no^RVppe 2ALGE ;
kodepivdo+v2+Sem/Dummytag:kode#pi^RVvdo 2NIJTTO ;
ohe+Sem/Dummytag:o^RVh^RCe 2VAHE ;
piškoolodeh+Sem/Dummytag:piškoo#lo^RVdde 2ALGE_PL ;
algâihe+Sem/Time:algâ#i^RVh^RCe 2VAHE "" ;
fijlo+v2+Sem/Tool:fi^RVjlo 2NIJTTO "viila" ;	! tags_via_apertium
tohe+Sem/Time:to^RVh^RCe 2VAHE "kerta" ;
itonartte+Sem/Plant:ito#na^RVrtte 2ALGE "iturikko" ;
ivne+v1+Sem/Feat-phys_Tool-write:i^RVvne 2NIJBE "väri" ;	! iivnest tags_via_apertium
kunnâtivre+v1+Sem/Ani-insect:kunnâ#ti^RVvre 2NIJBE "hyönteinen" ;
kyelipivdo+v2+Sem/Act:kyeli#pi^RVvdo 2NIJTTO ; ! tags_via_apertium
kárgámihe+Sem/Time:kárgám#i^RVh^RCe 2VAHE "karkausvuosi" ;
lanjâsaččinlodde+Sem/Ani-bird:lanjâsaččin#lo^RVdde 2ALGE ;
leibinijbe+v1+Sem/Tool:leibi#ni^RVjbe 2NIJBE "leipäveitsi" ;
lekkâmjuhleh+Sem/Event:lekkâm#ju^RVhle 2ALGE_PL "avajaiset" ;
lánjánijbe+v1+Sem/Tool:lánjá#ni^RVjbe 2NIJBE "" ;
nettisijđo+v1+Sem/Plc-abstr:netti#si^RVjđo 2NIJBE "nettisivu" ; ! tags_via_apertium
nettisijđo+v2+Sem/Plc-abstr:netti#si^RVjđo 2NIJTTO "nettisivu" ; ! tags_via_apertium
njivle+Sem/Aniprod_Hum:nji^RVvle 2ALGE "lima" ;	! tags_via_apertium
pevdilijne+Sem/Obj-clo:pevdi#li^RVjne 2NIJBE "pöytäliina" ; ! tags_via_apertium
pivdo+v2+Sem/Act:pi^RVvdo 2NIJTTO "pyynti" ;	!YAML tags_via_apertium
päikkilodde+Sem/Ani-bird:päikki#lo^RVdde 2ALGE "paikkalintu" ;
rijdo+v1+Sem/Act:ri^RVjdo 2NIJBE "riita" ;	! YAML tags_via_apertium
sijvo+v2+Sem/Wthr:si^RVjvo 2NIJTTO "keli" ;	! YAML tags_via_apertium
suovâlodde+Sem/Ani:suovâ#lo^RVdde 2ALGE ;
tijme+v2+Sem/Measr_Time:ti^RVjme 2NIJBE "tunti" ;	! tags_via_apertium
uásádâhkodde+Sem/Org:uásádâh#ko^RVdde 2ALGE "osuuskunta" ;
uđđâihe+Sem/Time:uđđâ#i^RVh^RCe 2VAHE "uusivuosi" ; ! tags_via_apertium
álguihe+Sem/Time:álgu#i^RVh^RCe 2VAHE "alkuvuosi" ;
